Florida, session 2026, SB284.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 19 20 Section 1.âSection 193.1553, Florida Statutes, is created 21 to read: 22 193.1553âAssessment of property owned and used by small 23 businesses.â 24 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âsmall businessâ has 25 the same meaning as in s. 288.703. 26 (2)âReal property owned and used for commercial purposes by 27 a small business will be assessed at just value as of January 1 28 of the year following the year in which the property first 29 qualifies as property owned and used by a qualifying small 30 business. Thereafter, the annual change in assessed value may 31 not exceed the lesser of: 32 (a)âThree percent of the assessment for the prior year; or 33 (b)âThe percent change in the Consumer Price Index for All 34 Urban Consumers, U.S. City Average, all items 1967=100, or a 35 successor index, for the preceding calendar year as initially 36 reported by the United States Department of Labor, Bureau of 37 Labor Statistics. 38 (3)âIf the assessed value of the property as calculated 39 under subsection (2) exceeds the just value, the assessed value 40 of the property must be lowered to the just value of the 41 property. 42 (4)âA change in ownership or control of the property, as 43 provided in s. 193.1554(5), which results in the property no 44 longer qualifying as owned and used by a small business, will 45 cause the property to be assessed at just value as of January 1 46 of the following year. 47 (5)âThe department shall prescribe by rule the application 48 and certification process for receiving an assessment limitation 49 under this section. The department may also adopt rules for 50 procedures for auditing small businesses receiving the 51 assessment limitation and revocation of improperly granted 52 assessment limitations. 53 (6)âA person who knowingly files false information to 54 obtain or retain the limitation provided by this section commits 55 a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 56 775.082 or s. 775.083, and is subject to payment of back taxes, 57 penalties, and interest as provided by general law. 58 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect on the effective date 59 of the amendment to the State Constitution proposed by SJR 282 60 or a similar joint resolution having substantially the same 61 specific intent and purpose, if such amendment is approved at 62 the next general election or at an earlier special election 63 specifically authorized by law for that purpose.